Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
Number of Reviews
26

Author
Michael Dequina
        Jon Turteltaub has proven to be an effective popcorn director for
Disney: among his credits are 1995's irresistible Sandra Bullock-Bill
Pullman romantic charmer _While_You_Were_Sleeping_ and the pleasant 1996
John Travolta fantasy-drama _Phenomenon_.  Like many a popcorn filmmaker
before him, Turteltaub has apparently felt need to prove his dramatic
chops, hence his name at the helm of the psychological drama _Instinct_. 
But instead of coming up with something reminiscent of, say,
_The_Silence_of_the_Lambs_ (whose spirit Turteltaub clearly tries to
evoke) the soggy result is more along the manipulative lines of
_Patch_Adams_--which, coincidentally enough, was an attempt at a "heavy"
effort by "light" director Tom Shadyac.
The _Silence_ similarity shines through most brightly with the presence
of Anthony Hopkins, who plays another diagnosed psychotic in _Instinct_:
primatologist Ethan Powell, who returns to the United States from the
African wilds a silent, quick-tempered, animalistic murderer sentenced to
a prison for the criminally insane.  More shades of _Silence_ come in
when an ambitious youngster--in this case, psychiatrist Dr. Theo Caulder
(Cuba Gooding Jr.)--is called on to unlock Powell's brilliant but
disturbed mind.
If Turteltaub and scripter Gerald DiPego had left _Instinct_ that basic,
the film would not have been great, but it certainly would have been
better than it currently is.  Living up to their reputations as
Oscar-winning actors, neither Hopkins nor Gooding embarrass themselves,
delivering respectable performances and displaying a convincing rapport. 
What is embarrassing, however, is the amount of sappy manipulation
Turteltaub and DiPego slap onto this primary plotline.  Of course,
_Instinct_ is not only about Powell's mysterious African adventure but
also how he and Caulder change each other.  But it did it have to be
quite so maudlin, with Caulder delivering a histrionic "This Is How I've
Changed" monologue that also doubles as a teary farewell scene?
Perhaps that should not have been so surprising, since, contrary to
outward appearances, the film's main concern is not the divide between
man's animalistic and civilized nature but shameless tearwringing.  The
reality of Powell's time in Africa and the reasons for his change are
considerably less interesting than they promise to be; at the heart of it
is none other than the L-word, love--for a family of gorillas.  Also, the
_Patch_Adams_ comparison is actually quite apt, for one prominent subplot
deals with mistreatment of inmates at Powell's prison, led by a brutal
guard (John Ashton), who, in turn, is overseen by a hardass warden (John
Aylward) who won't hear of Caulder's ideas of gentler treatment.  One
pivotal scene where all the inmates finally take a stand for themselves
is every bit as gagworthy as _Patch_'s infamous hearing with the
red-nosed cancer kids.
After seeing the abomination that is _Instinct_, it is understandable
why Hopkins toyed with retirement from film acting; it is soulless
exercises in manipulation such as this that robs any of the enjoyment or
genuine excitement of  cinema.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com___________________________________________________________________
You don't need to buy Internet access to use free Internet e-mail.
Get completely free e-mail from Juno at http://www.juno.com/getjuno.html
or call Juno at (800) 654-JUNO [654-5866]

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Gerald Di Pego, based on the novel "Ishmael" by Daniel Quinn
Starring: Cuba Gooding Jr., Anthony Hopkins, Donald Sutherland, Maura Tierney
Synopsis: 
Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.) is a young psychiatrist who has been given
an interesting case to study: An anthropologist named Ethan Powell (Anthony
Hopkins) who has lost his humanity living in the Rwandan wilderness among
mountain gorillas has been caught, deported, and sent to an American prison
psychiatric ward after killing two rangers. Caulder makes regular therapy
visits to converse with Powell and to try to figure out his mentality. Is
Powell a brutal killer, an ape man, or a downtrodden naturalist with a
legitimate complaint against society? 
Opinion:
INSTINCT plays like a mystery. Mountain gorillas are gentle herbivores who
only attack in self defense, so what could possibly cause an eminent
scientist with the mentality and friendship of herbivores to go out and
attack rangers? Psychiatrist Theo Caulder takes the whole movie to find out
the reason when the answer is obvious. 
INSTINCT isn't very convincing. As Powell Anthony Hopkins seems too
educated and studious to have ape-like episodes of superhuman strength and
brutish behavior. It makes the character seem more like a split personality
than a scientist with a secret reason. That a keen mind such as Powell's
would relish an alternate identity as a primitive, grass-eating forest
creature instead of using his wits and tool-making abilities in the jungle
is barely credible. Similarly unconvincing is the bond between Theo Caulder
and Ethan Powell. Their psychiatric relationship is a clinical,
teacher/student thing. But as Caulder Cuba Gooding Jr. seems overly
emotional, as if the two protagonists had shared more happy moments than
they actually had.
The film's major theme is the innocence of nature versus the corruption of
humanity. This is a noble goal, but INSTINCT hits you over the head with
it. As Powell Anthony Hopkins even draws a colored map of ancient Earth and
diagrams man's historic exploitation of nature. Much more compelling is the
side plot involving Maura Tierney as Powell's neglected daughter, trying to
understand why her father had abandoned the family. To me, a more
intriguing INSTINCT would be a complex movie about a daughter trying to
rediscover the lost father she never knew. 
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Violence has become a negative catch-word recently, so it's
refreshing to see how the concept is explored in this psychological
thriller, based on Daniel Quinn's book "Ismael." Anthony Hopkins plays
a highly respected primatologist who has been jailed for killing two
Rwandan rangers and injuring others after choosing to live in the wild
with mountain gorillas for nearly two years. Held captive in an
overcrowded maximum security prison for the criminally insane, he is
interrogated by a bright, ambitious psychiatrist, Cuba Gooding Jr.,
who is eager to understand the mysterious truth behind the scientist's
actions in anticipation of writing a best-seller. While simplistic,
Gerald DiPego's script is intelligent and thoughtful, delving into the
concepts of illusion and freedom, combined with the lust for
domination and control, ultimately dividing people into "givers" and
"takers." Director Jon Turtletaub ("Phenomenon") integrates the brutal
reality of prison life with memories of what transpired in Africa to
motivate Hopkins' violent behavior. The challenging, combative
chemistry between Anthony Hopkins and Cuba Gooding Jr. is palpable,
escalating the tension level, which is already elevated by the hostile
sadism of the prison's guards and warden. But a subplot involving
Maura Tierney as Hopkins' daughter never jells, and the conclusion is
cloyingly melodramatic. Arguably the most versatile and talented actor
on the screen today, Anthony Hopkins evokes a volatile power and fury
reminiscent of Hannibal Lechter in "The Silence of the Lambs," while
Cuba Gooding Jr. displays a forceful, bruising intensity. And
special-effects wizard Stan Winston works wonders with the
gorillas. On the Granger Movie Gauge, "Instinct" is a compelling 7,
commanding attention from start to finish.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more movie reviews and screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Seeing this movie's trailer, I wasn't sure whether this was a film about a
man's love for monkeys, or an intense thriller pitting two of our best
modern day actors against one another, a la THE NEGOTIATOR (7/10). It turned
out to be a little bit of both, although the intensity of the thrills were
at a much lower level than the man's love for his monkeys.
PLOT:
A doctor who was lost in the African jungles for two years, and known to
live side-by-side with gorillas, is found after he savagely murders two game
wardens. Upon his return to the States, a young, career-minded psychiatrist
is chosen to attempt to communicate with the man and understand his violent
and anti-social behavior.
CRITIQUE:
One part ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST (7/10), one part THE SHAWSHANK
REDEMPTION (9/10) and one part GORILLAS IN THE MIST, one part SILENCE OF THE
LAMBS (7.5/10), and one really big part TARZAN. This film offers very little
in originality or thrills, but does manage to convey an effective loving
relationship between the good doctor and the gorillas, and some superb
acting on the part of the two lead actors. In fact, I think I would have
been really bored were it not for the intense and believable portrayals of
both characters. Anthony Hopkins plays an excellent doctor gone semi-loony
who has us believing that a man of his intelligence could truly be taken in
by a family of gorillas. Cuba Gooding's doctor Dooright character also
meanders through every emotion flawlessly with all of his happiness,
sadness, fear and cockiness creating a character to whom we can all relate
and invest our emotion.
Were there enough twists in the plot? No, not at all. Pretty predictable.
Were there any crazy monkey love-making scenes? Certainly not. But what this
film does offer is a couple of great actors chewing down on some pretty
tasty lines inside a plot which may resonate with some, in respect to its
derogatory depiction of modern-day living, and society's over-emphasis on
control, possessions, career and dominance. Now the lack of originality or
action may have some of you returning to your ticket counter and demanding
that they "Show you your money back!" (I'm sorry, but I just had to! :), but
I quite enjoyed the performances in this film, and its oddly satisfying
conclusion. Skip it if you're looking for an intense thriller or a sci-fi
man-turns-into-a-gorilla vibe (ALTERED STATES (5/10) fans beware!), but
check it out if you like either of the two leads or movies with monkeys in
'em!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Anthony Hopkins' role was originally slated for Sean Connery. He probably
turned it down because he already sported that ugly, long, dirty grey
haircut in THE ROCK (7/10). Being British, Mr. Hopkins was glad to have
conquered his alcoholism in 1975. He stands 5'7".
Cuba Gooding Jr's first big-screen role came as the "boy getting haircut" in
Eddie Murphy's 1988 hit COMING TO AMERICA (8/10). He reportedly received
only $32,000 for his breakthrough role in 1991's BOYZ IN THE HOOD (8/10),
while pocketing around $2.5 Million for his part in this one. He stands
5'10", and was born in The Bronx, New York. He also appeared in four
episodes of TV's "MacGyver" from 1989 to 1991.
Director Jon Turteltaub went from directing such films as 3 NINJAS and COOL
RUNNINGS to 1995's WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING and 1996's PHENOMENON.
Believe it or not, the gorillas used in the film were not real. They all
came from the wonderful world of Stan Winston's puppet Studio.
This film was originally titled ISHMAEL, based on the novel of the same name
by Daniel Quinn. The film credits this book as the piece from which its
script was "suggested".
Most of the jungle scenes were actually shot in Jamaica.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Instinct (1999)
Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura Tierney, 
George Dzundza, John Ashton, Paul Bates, Ian Ingram, Thomas Q. Morris.
 Music by Danny Elfman. Screenplay by Gerald Di Pego, inspired by 
"Ishmael" by Daniel Quinn. Directed by Jon Turteltaub. 125 minutes.
Rated R, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests 
I felt strongly conflicted while watching "Instinct." Part of me 
wanted to just surrender and enjoy the film, relishing the strong 
acting and philosophical message. But every time I gave in, something 
would happen to remind me that, beneath the surface, this was just 
another mainstream Hollywood movie. "Instinct" is extremely 
derivative, needlessly manipulative and even a bit superficial, but 
I'm still giving the film a qualified recommendation because, as 
annoying as the bad parts are, the good parts are really, really good.
Cuba Gooding Jr. plays Theo Caulder, an upwardly mobile psychiatrist 
given the juicy assignment of assessing Dr. Ethan Powell (Anthony 
Hopkins), a renown anthropologist and primatologist who left for 
Africa to study gorillas and returned a madman. Seems that the doctor,
 whose relations with his family were distant at best, developed a 
much better rapport with the great apes. Powell disappeared into the 
jungle, only to emerge much later in chains, accused of attacking a 
group of men and murdering two of them. 
Housed in the psychiatric wing of a maximum security prison after 
being shipped back to the States, Powell is to be evaluated for 
competency. Young Caulder sees a career boost, and a possible best-
seller, in his new patient, but as he tenuously builds a relationship 
with the damaged man, he discovers something far more significant.
One of the best things about "Instinct" is the casting, along with 
most of the performances. In the wake of his Academy Award-winning 
turn in "Jerry Maguire" and wildly jubilant acceptance speech at the 
Oscar ceremonies, Cuba Gooding Jr. has done the over-enthusiastic rah-
rah bit to death, culminating in a series of soft drink commercials 
where he comes off like a coked-up personal trainer gone berserk. 
Thankfully, Gooding is controlled, thoughtful and quite engaging here 
(although in one scene, where he leads a group of prisoners in a 
defiant chant, I half expected him to start thrusting cans of Pepsi 
at the convicts). Gooding makes the transition from silky opportunist 
to shaken human being very effectively, and he works beautifully with 
Anthony Hopkins.
As usual, Hopkins is superb, taking a role earlier slated for Sean 
Connery and putting his own definitive stamp on the character. 
Manacled and slightly hunched over, he silently peers out from his 
long white hair like a leopard behind wild reeds. Hopkins doesn't 
just play the deranged anthropologist, he inhabits him. From the 
film's moving (and incredibly realistic) scenes of Powell communing 
with a family of gorillas, to a stunning extended sequence where he 
gives Caulder a harrowing lesson on the illusion of control, Hopkins' 
work is flawless. 
Alas, the script is not. Gooding and Hopkins are so strong that it 
takes awhile to notice that the production is a somewhat sluggish 
pastiche of other movies, from "Gorillas in the Mist" to "One Flew 
Over the Cuckoo's Nest," with a healthy dose of "Equus" to boot. The 
film even includes the "standing in the rain with arms outstretched 
as a metaphor for freedom" overhead crane shot from "The Shawshank 
Redemption," "Pleasantville" and God knows how many other flicks. 
While the image was once evocative, it now needs to be put out to 
pasture once and for all.
Hopefully there's also room in that pasture for lovable loonies, 
another irritating movie cliché. Mental illness isn't adorable, as 
everyone (except screenwriters) already knows, but "Instinct" offers 
a pair of convicts who, despite being criminally insane, are more 
insufferably cute than all four "Teletubbies" combined. 
While "Instinct" embraces too many trite plot devices, it 
successfully navigates past a few. Even though "NewsRadio's" Maura 
Tierney, playing Powell's estranged daughter, achieves a nice 
chemistry with Gooding, their relationship remains platonic, sparing 
us a needless romantic subplot. 
Unfortunately, the filmmakers don't resist the temptation to wrap up 
their story with a stupid Hollywood ending. I won't disclose the 
details, but as you leave the theater, consider the logistics of the 
final image and ask yourself how it could have occurred. The answer 
is simple: it couldn't. While you're at it, reflect on how the 
resolution seems to negate the one thing for which Powell gives 
Caulder thanks. Better yet, do yourself a favor and don't stay for 
the ending. I'm serious. Late in the film, when Gooding finishes his 
speech about "the game," get up and walk out. Then, on the way home, 
make up your own ending. I guarantee that whatever you come up with 
will be more plausible that what the writers concocted. 
Despite the clichés, despite the languid pacing, despite seeing great 
character actors cast as stereotypes, and even despite the ending, 
I'm still glad I saw "Instinct." The film delivers a message that, 
however obvious, bears repeating. And it provides a fine showcase for 
the considerable talents of Cuba Gooding Jr. and Anthony Hopkins. To 
watch actors as electric as those two, it's worth sitting through the 
rough stuff. 

Author
DeWyNGaLe
INSTINCT by John Sylva (DewyNGale@aol.com)    Rating: C+
http://members.aol.com/DeWyNGaLe
Anthony Hopkins could very well be the greatest actor alive today.  Cuba
Gooding Jr. could very well be the greatest young actor alive today.  What
happens when you mix then in a film similar to one of Hopkins' classics,
Silence of the Lambs?
Primatologist Ethan Powell, played by Anthony Hopkins, has an obsession with
the species of gorilla.  For a long time, Ethan lived with gorillas in the
forests of Africa, abandoning his wife and daughter Lynn, played by Maura
Tierney, taking on their behavior, becoming a part of their family.  After
being found, Powell is accused of clubbing two park rangers to death, but he
chooses to remain silent at all times, so therefore he cannot represent himself
in court to defend himself.  To try to break the barrier, to try and regain the
person that Dr. Powell once was, psychiatrist Theo Caulder, played by Cuba
Gooding Jr. is sent in to try to put an end to the mystery.
As Theo continues to meet with the strange man, he starts to unravel the
mystery behind him.  During every visitation between the two, Theo unlocks
another secret that start to lead to the question- Is this man really that bad?
 The two start to become friends of sorts, speaking frequently.  Unfortunately,
to Lynn's dismay, Ethan refuses to discuss her, and when her name comes up he
becomes very angry.  Theo is now not only meeting with his main focus, but
other patients at the high security Florida prison.  The film goes off into a
sub-plot about morals, and treating people right, especially in prison.  I
would have liked it if the writers stuck with the main plot, and not gone off
with a much seen plot. 
Cuba Gooding Jr. is exceeding any past performance of his in Instinct, but
unfortunately, the rest of the cast, plot, and the poor directing by John
Turteltaub do not live up to the astonishing performance that he put forward. 
Believe it or not, Anthony Hopkins actually didn't do all that admirable at his
underwritten role.  Maybe if the screenplay writer, Gerald Di Pego, had done
more with Dr. Ethan Powell than have him sit there and say a word here and
there, Anthony Hopkins could have given a much more commendable performance.
Instinct frustrated me with all of my might.  It is one of those films that is
like a go-cart.  It gets going, and then it stops.  It slowly gains speed, only
to be shut down once again.  Instinct is the exact same way.  The perfect time
to set off something happens all over the place, but nothing happens, except
for the scenes comes to and end.  Because of this, Instinct never really went
anywhere.  It ended up being more of a history book than a movie.  The moral of
the story was an exceptionally brilliant one, but it has been used so many
times in other movies, the repetitiveness is getting annoying.  Yes, we know by
know, Hollywood, that killing animals and judging people is wrong.  Can't we
move on?  I'm not saying this movie is bad for this repetitive moral, I am just
saying that filmmakers today should move on to bigger and better things.   The
plot and characters barely develop, and barely anything is accomplished during
the entire film.
When going into Instinct, I expected a thrilling, exciting film with starring
two of today's greatest actors.  Instead of that, I got a slow drama, copying
off of many past films, trying to mix Silence of the Lambs with Patch Adams,
and excluding Cuba Gooding Jr., the actors seemed like copycats trying to act
like the actors.  Is this because of the poor writing and directing, or are
these actors really running out of steam?  Director Turteltaub tries to use the
same sort of style he did in the wonderful film Phenomenon, where everything
came pretty slow, and ended up in something great, but in Instinct, it doesn't
really end up anywhere.
The Bottom Line- Cuba Gooding Jr. and Anthony Hopkins should have used their
instincts, and stayed away from this poorly written drama.

Author
David N. Butterworth
        In his previous outing, "Phenomenon," the director proved guilty of
beating us about the face and neck with heavy-handed metaphors.  For his
latest film, a psychological thriller with the curiously unmemorable title
"Instinct" (perhaps "The Silence of the Gorillas in the Mist" would have
been more appropriate), Turteltaub has toned the meaningful allusions down
some, but he still doesn't miss the opportunity to close in on his actors
the minute their eyes well with tears.  This happens not once but twice in
"Instinct," and by the second time it's clear that Turteltaub still favors
sledgehammer manipulation over nuance.
        That's not the only problem with "Instinct."  Perhaps its biggest
failing is that it's just not very interesting.  Whatever potential there
was in Daniel Quinn's book remains unrealized by the director, the writer,
and the actors--hard as they may try.
        Dr. Ethan Powell (the reliable Anthony Hopkins) is an
anthropologist who disappears for two years after studying gorillas
(courtesy Stan Winston) in the African bush.  He surfaces in a Rwandan
jail, found guilty of killing two game wardens and injuring three others.
Following Powell's transfer to a Florida penitentiary, an ambitious
University of Miama psychiatry resident called Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding,
Jr.) takes a crack at evaluating the intriguing primatologist, who hasn't
spoken a word in over a year.
        Caulder's goal is to determine what turned Powell into a killer,
but the deeper he digs into his patient's psyche, the stronger becomes his
determination to win the man's freedom.
        One of the catches behind Caulder's assignment is that he's
required to serve as the staff psychiatrist at the ironically-named Harmony
Bay Correctional Facility for the duration of his appraisal.  Imagine a
sharp-dressed Cuba Gooding, Jr. surrounded by the scum of society and you
might anticipate some humor in the situation.  The filmmakers, however,
choose to milk this situation of its "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest"
parallels, with the stubborn Caulder fighting to change the maximum
security prison's rules by giving the mild-mannered felons a fair shot at
privilege against the big gorillas holding all the aces.
        It's hard referring to the film as a thriller since what few
thrills there are culminate in a real bonehead of a revelation.  In
addition, the prison officials are depicted as one-dimensional
caricatures--the brutal cell guard, the insensitive warden, etc.--and the
inmates are even more clichéd.  This subtracts from the drama, and provides
an embarrassing backdrop to all the anthropological philosophizing.
        Hopkins, however, does a fine job as the troubled "ape man."  With
his flowing white hair and disheveled appearance, our first sighting of him
is a throwback to Sean Connery's character in "The Rock," shuffling,
manacled, and badly in need of a barber.  Or, come to think of it, Anthony
Hopkins' character in "The Mask of Zorro"!  Over the years, the 61-year-old
Hopkins has fine-tuned his ability to exhibit power and emotional depth
simply with his eyes and his softly-spoken delivery.  This isn't a
performance on a par with, say, Hannibal Lecter, but it's got its
fascinating moments.  Gooding, Jr. proves a satisfying complement to
Hopkins, but Maura Tierney ("Forces of Nature"), who plays Powell's
estranged daughter, isn't given much to do.
        Rather than dealing with serious psychological or celestial issues
like those in "Instinct" and "Phenomenon," Turteltaub might do better by
returning to lighter, "While You Were Sleeping"-type fare.

Author
Mikhail Iosjpe
To make a long story short - "Instinct" is a modern Tarzan-story with a dose
of social critisism. Dr. Ethan Powell ( Anthony Hopkins ) has suddenly been
found and imprisoned for killing two African guards after he disappeared two
years ago.
He has not spoken a single word since he has been found and he has become
distant and violent. Powell is then transferred to a special prison in the
U.S, where helpless lunatics are beaten and discriminated by the prison
guards.
Here is where Dr. Theo Calder ( Cuba Gooding, Jr. ) steps in. He is a young
and so far successful psychiatrist whose task is to write an evaluation on
Powell to determine why a brilliant scientist has suddenly become insane and
isolated himself from his family and the rest of the world. Later Theo finds
out that Powell has been living with wild gorillas for two years, instead of
studding them and has somehow made a connection; became a member of the
family. He has seen how the Africans killed the gorillas, how they pillaged
and destroyed. That  is why his violent behavior is to some point justified
by mankind's "rape of the world". Slowly when Theo is venturing deep into
Powell's mind, we get to witness his journey from the beginning. The African
jungle is here displayed as a peaceful eden - a paradise slowly transformed
into hell.
And here is the beautiful part of the film, it is also by the way the most
serious part -
Powell dreams of a world where we kill only as much as we can eat, where we
live like we have lived 10 000 years ago, in harmony with the nature instead
of in "control" of it.
The script is serious, solid and well written, exploring the true nature of
man, as well as our social and family mentality. The casting is likewise
solid, but there are specially Hopkins'and Gooding's performances that are
worth noticing. Stan Winston's computerized gorillas are incredibly
realistic and Danny Elfman's score, although not great, is at times
effective.  So it's actually nothing bad to say about "Instinct".
However, instead of venturing deeper into the lost instincts and explore the
true nature of man, Jon Turteltaub is concentrating his energy on the
difficult conditions in the prison and Theo's romance with Powell's daughter
(which by the way fails to capture my attention or emotions). The film's
lack of  focus is a bit disturbing. Another very important thing to notice
is that it never answers the question: "What is it we should do?", "Should
we throw our clothes off and return to the jungle, like Powell?" or should
we all become vegetarians? My point is that "Instinct" showed us how we are
like from nature's point of view - greedy, violent and stupid, sawing the
branch we're sitting on. But it is never said what we should do about it.
The important questions are asked, but never answered. Some of you may say
that everyone should figure this one out for themselves. Maybe so, but I
feel that after asking these important questions it's equally important to
answer them. It's like the director was not sure himself and found the easy
way out. However the film's many good moments, such as Powell's explanation
of control, and solid acting saves the film. It's not a bad movie and it's
not a masterpiece. It will not get any important nominations at the Oscar's,
but it's a well made film with a serious and important subject worth
thinking and making films about.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
No, it's not the sequel to Silence of the Lambs, but it sure feels like
it.  Cuba Gooding Jr. (What Dreams May Come) stars as Theo Caulder, an
ass-kissing, ladder-climbing psych resident at the University of Miami.
Caulder's mentor (Donald Sutherland, Without Limits) gives him a dream
assignment  to clinically evaluate a convicted murderer just days
before his competency hearing.
The killer is Dr. Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins, Meet Joe Black), a
former anthropology professor at the U of M.  The mild-mannered Powell
disappeared while studying a family of gorillas in an African jungle,
only to re-emerge two years later as a crazy-eyed killer with long
hair.  He also hasn't spoken since his capture, so Caulder has his work
cut out for him.
Unfortunately, Caulder must agree to evaluate the other kooks in Harmony
Bay prison.  The result is an annoyingly contrived peripheral plot that
does nothing but slow down the pace of the film, as does the strange
relationship between Caulder and Powell's daughter (Maura Tierney,
NewsRadio).  Of other interest is the prison battle between Powell and
the sadistic guard, played by eternal bad guy John Ashton (Meet the
Deedles).  Meet Joe Black?  Meet the Deedles?  Meet the back of my hand.
What could have happened in the jungle to turn the esteemed Dr. Powell
from Richard Attenborough in Miracle on 34th Street to Sean Connery in
the beginning of The Rock?  What ever it was, it couldn't have been as
horrible as sitting through this beast of a film.  Instinct drags along
like Keyser Soze's gimpy leg, stopping only to feature a few bad cliches
(namely a prison rebellion scene reminiscent of the football drama
Rudy).
On the plus side, Gooding is a lot better than Denzel Washington would
have been if he had won the role (and he probably would have three years
ago).  Gooding shows range and charisma, both words assumed to be
unknown to Mr. Washington.  The interaction between Gooding and Hopkins
is also better than average, but when they swap their roles of doctor
and patient, you can't help but think of the far superior relationship
between Hopkins' Hannibal Lecter and his evaluator, Clarice Starling.
Directed by Jon Turteltaub (Phenomenon), Instinct is based on a book
called `Ishmael' by Daniel Quinn and adapted for the screen by Message
in a Bottle scribe Gerald DiPego.  It features some very real-looking
fake gorillas, courtesy of Stan Winston, and has a classy Danny Elfman
score.  The good news is that the novel that will serve as the sequel to
Lambs comes out soon.  The bad news is that it may not be good enough to
wash off the stench of Instinct.  (2:04  R for intense violent
behavior)

Author
Jamey Hughton
More MOVIE VIEWS at:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
Instinct is a good movie trapped in a gorilla suit of derivative clichés
and plodding ideas. The result is an occasionally powerful, extremely
well acted movie that never finds a confident emotional center.
Anthony Hopkins is a marvelous actor, with a screen presence that
commands all of the viewer's attention toward him. At first glance of
his role as Ethan Powell, a mentally disturbed anthropologist, you may
think Hopkins is reprising his role as Hannibal Lector from The Silence
of the Lambs. The character does have some of the same grisly
mannerisms, but there is one big difference: he doesn't eat people.
Still, Powell has killed two park rangers and wounded three others,
while studying gorillas on location in the jungles of Rwanda.
Called in to investigate is a young, idealistic shrink named Theo
Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.), who (predictably) goes at the assignment as
if it were a walk in the park. From here, Instinct relies on the study
of human behavior for interesting material. It's unfortunate that the
movie never displays it's own humanity that strongly. There are isolated
moments of sheer power, care of Hopkins and his dedicated performance,
but the film's heart is rarely in the right place at the right time.
Instinct is too uneven to be rightfully enjoyed.
The material here may have been rendered laughable if it weren't for the
acting abilities of the two leads. Anthony Hopkins is excellent, and
Gooding Jr. shows fierce optimism for scene after scene of his demanding
role. Another disappointment is the lack of background supplied for the
character of Theo Caulder. We're told that he's a hot shot shrink on the
way up, but we never find out if he has a family, nor are we informed of
his roots in the psychiatric business. Donald Sutherland has a minor
role as Gooding's mentor and boss.
Even if the acting in Instinct is exceptional, it still cannot salvage
the rest of the film. The storyline is similar to countless others, like
Tarzan and The Shawshank Redemption, just to name a few. Scenes in which
we learn the explanation for Powell's psychotic behavior are undoubtedly
the most effective moments, but the presentation leaves much to be
desired.
Another conventional sub-plot involves Powell being reunited with his
daughter (Maura Tierney). But even as the film hovers around this
subject for a large portion of running time, the meeting at the end
lacks all the emotional potential that we were hoping for.
Instinct is not a bad film, but the misguided direction disables it from
shining through. Once you get past the powerful performances from the
two very capable actors, what you're left with is a troubled project
with no driving force whatsoever.

Author
Marty Mapes
** (out of 4) INSTINCT is that odd movie that is thought-provoking and
worth talking about, yet is still somehow bad. 
INSTINCT is "suggested by" Daniel Quinn's book ISHMAEL, in which a
talking gorilla takes a human student. Using the Socratic method, he
teaches the student to see humanity, materialism, development, and human
culture, through the eyes of a simpler, less greedy soul. Most of the
book is filled with their telepathic conversation. It's pretty
unfilmable stuff.
Naturally, INSTINCT diverges from the book in many ways. The "teacher"
is now Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins), the anthropologist who has just
been found after disappearing for two years. During that time he lived
among a tribe of African gorillas. He has not spoken since his return to
civilization.
The "student" is now Theo (Cuba Gooding Jr.), a psychiatrist just
completing his residency. Theo hears about Ethan and is intrigued. He
pulls every string he has in order to get Ethan's case. (The "Socratic
method" is now a power trip, complete with death threats.) 
Screenwriter Gerald Di Pego (who also wrote Turteltaub's PHENOMENON)
does a great job of introducing Theo's character. His ingenious gamble
helps a paranoid patient have a breakthrough. And yet the scene is still
formulaic. Replace "psychiatrist" with "hostage negotiator" and you'd
have the same opening scene as two or three cop movies in the last year.
This pattern of small pockets of greatness in an otherwise bad script is
repeated throughout the movie.
Theo gives an emotional speech at the end. Gooding gives a top-notch
performance, and the actions of his character make the speech seem
appropriate. But the specific words of his speech sound so written and
hollow, that it's almost hard to take it seriously. 
Much of the movie takes place in a psychiatric prison, where a random
system is used for determining who gets fresh air privileges. But the
system is such that the strong can attack the weak and steal the
privilege, making the dysfunctional patients seem even more animal-like.
The whole prison seems to be a system of dominance and submission, so
that watching the movie is much like studying aggression in animals. But
the characters are treated as human props. They aren't well developed.
Their few actions are motivated by the script and not by any emotional
soul.
It's hard to go wrong on the cinematography when you have a lush jungle
to film. But when Anthony Hopkins breasts the utopian green hilltop, it
seems like stock footage from a time-share sales pitch. It's too easy
and obvious and it doesn't add to the character or the film.
One final point is worth noting. Danny Elfman composed the score for
this film. Usually, when Elfman is involved, you can tell by listening.
For the BATMAN movies he scored circus music into his orchestra. For A
SIMPLE PLAN he had the violins play just off-key enough to make you
squirm. But in INSTINCT, there is no quirk, no distinctive signature. It
seemed like a waste of Elfman's particular talents.
In all fairness, I found this movie to be a great conversation piece.
All the sparkling good ideas were memorable enough to grab onto and
examine more closely. But that's not enough to recommend it.
Turteltaub's last movie was PHENOMENON, which was a melodramatic drop of
syrup that I savored (yes, more than once.) But INSTINCT is somehow
harder to swallow. I couldn't tell if you if it was too sweet or too
insubstantial, but somehow, the recipe just wasn't right.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.moviehabit.com

Author
Christopher Null
     Sad but true, that's all it takes to boil down INSTINCT, a curious
blend of thriller and feel-good prison movie that manages to somehow be
neither.
     The story of Ethan Powell (Hopkins), a highly intelligent doctor
(sound familiar yet?) and primatologist who opts to live with the
gorillas in Rwanda for a couple of years, and goes a bit primal on us.
Several years later, Doc Powell is extradited after murdered a few
Rwandans.  Oh, and he won't speak any more.  So they bring in hotshot
psychiatrist resident Theo Caulder (Gooding) to deconstruct Powell and
bring him back into the fold.
     Here's where we throw in a little CUCKOO'S NEST (in fact, several
of the inmates of Powell's prison seem lifted from CUCKOO's NEST
entirely!).  I half-expected to see Chief along the way.
     Despite the movie's pretense, there's little mystery along the
way.  We know all along who gets killed and why.  If *you* can't figure
it out, you need to go see STAR WARS again.  But aside from some lightly
humorous moments, INSTINCT is largely predictable and tiresome, and it
isn't likely to click with many audiences.  And let me just add that
Maura Tierney (Powell's daughter) has *always* rubbed me the wrong way.
     INSTINCT is not a bad movie.  It's just not a terribly well-made
one.  Regardless, I'm sure I won't be the only one (accidentally)
calling it "Instink".
Christopher Null - null@sirius.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1

Author
Greg King
INSTINCT (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Jon Turteltaub
Stars: Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding jr, Donald Sutherland, Maura 
Tierney, George Dzundza, John 
Ashton, John Aylward, Thomas Q Morris, Paul Bates.
In a role that can be considered a warm up rehearsal before
reprising his famous character of suave serial cannibal Hannibal
Lecter, Anthony Hopkins plays Ethan Powell, a renowned anthropologist
accused of murder.  For many years, Powell has lived amongst the
renowned silver back gorillas of Rwanda, observing them.  For some
reason this male equivalent of Dian Fossey snaps and brutally murders
two men.  Imprisoned in a hell hole in Rwanda, he has refused to speak
to anyone for two years.  This enigmatic scientist is then extradited
back to America, and imprisoned while awaiting an evaluation to
determine his competency to stand trial.
Eager young psychiatry student Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding jr)
is assigned the task of breaking through the doctor's reticence and
silence and determining what happened in the jungles of Rwanda.
Powell challenges Caulder's perception of the world around him, and
somehow turns the tables on the fledgling psychiatrist.  He also
inspires Caulder to introduce a number of changes to the oppressive
prison system that negates the authority and abusive power of the
wardens and guards.  Instinct is a taut and occasionally riveting
psychological thriller that has its flaws.  Written by Gerald DiPego
(Phenomenon, etc), the film combines elements of Silence Of The Lambs,
Gorillas In The Mist and One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest with many of
the clichés of the prison movie.
 The plot is predictable, and the script is further let down by some
one dimensional characterisation and some clichéd dialogue.
However, Jon Turteltaub (Phenomenon, etc) directs the material with an
assurance that glosses over some of these flaws.  Some scenes bristle
with an almost palpable tension.  Hopkins and Gooding generate enough
sparks in their confrontations to bring some energy and a touch of
class to the film.  Hopkins is superb although he delivers a mannered
performance as the tormented scientist.  Scene stealer Gooding more
than holds his own here and delivers his usual polished performance.
Maura Tierney (Liar Liar, etc) has little to do as Powell's estranged
daughter, but she adds a touch of dignity and sympathy to her
performance.  Donald Sutherland plays Caulder mentor, a stereotyped
role that has almost become a staple of his repertoire.

Author
Ross Anthony
Perhaps, like the human race itself, "Instinct," far from flawless is
nonetheless seductively imperious, and yes, as lovable as a perfect paradox.
Though difficult to accept when seen on the screen for the first time,
Anthony Hopkins plays a brutal savage (Ethan Powell). Cuba Gooding Jr. is
Dr. Caulder, the star psychiatric resident. Seems anthropologist Ethan
Powell spent a few too many nights out with the gorillas -- a few dead
Rwandans later, he's extradited to the U.S. for trial. In the meantime,
Caulder does his best to free Powell ... from himself, from his insanity ..
well at least from Harmony Bay, your stereotypically violent psychiatric
prison.
It's a good film, but here's what it does poorly: 1) Its introductory
special effects (freezes/strobe-slowmo/reverse color) are cliché and
anti-dramatic. 2) Sutherland's Hollywood line, "He lives with the animals
... becomes one .. how does that happen?" sounds like an actor's line, not a
psychiatrist's. Is it really that unclear anyway? Still, the over-dramatic
question sets up the rest of the film rather nicely. 3) Once the cocky
Caulder takes the case, he boasts, "What if I can get him to speak?" The
film inflates this question with nothing more than hot air since we had not
been shown even one incident of Powell refusing to speak. Alas, Caulder's
line falls like a feather in a vacuum. 4) Other relationships beg
development. Powell's daughter, a fine character, is used only peripherally.
Then there are Powell's fellow inmates, although Caulder was strapped into
consulting with them, we see only dabs of interaction. 5) Gooding's
character is set up as the sharp buttocks-kissing corporate climber, yet we
witness him berate those he works with at Harmony Bay. Although, it's fun,
it isn't Caulder. The actor is directed out of character simply for dramatic
effect. 6) And lastly, Powell's personality is changed in only 2 years of
"hangin'" in the jungle. I would have expected 2 decades.
Okay, now the good stuff: 1) "Instinct" tells a great story that stands
steadfast to its sharply pointed question. "Who is the real savage?" 2) Two
excellent performers. 3) Solid focused dialogue. Here are a few examples:
Powell, "There's more danger in any city in the world than in the forest."
Caulder, "I never quit ... even when I'm doing something really stupid."
Caulder, "Your father may be very ill." Powell's Daughter, "Oh really, I
thought he was just in a bad mood." 4) And of course, there were times when
the heavy dramatics actually worked. 5) Lastly, the music. It's an excellent
driving score.
At the end of the day, "Instinct" has a pounding heart so powerful that it
makes its flaws drop like ticks off the hide of a charging Silverback
gorilla.
Starring Anthony Hopkins and Cuba Gooding Jr.
Directed by Jon Turteltaub.
Screenplay by Gerald DiPego. Produced by Michael Taylor and Barbara Boyle at
Touchstone/Spyglass.
Grade..........................A-
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Walter Frith
What do you get when you cross two terrific Oscar winning actors with a
totally unoriginal story?  Two Oscar winning actors appearing in an
unoriginal story, of course.  Sound silly?  Try and equate the question and
answer you just read with the feeling you'll experience after seeing
'Instinct'.  Sleeping pills may be needed to stay awake during this film
that is like an airliner that never gets off the ground.  You just sit there
and wait for something to happen.
The posturing of 'Instinct' is outrageously insulting to a movie buff.
There is a combination of 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest', 'The Silence of
the Lambs' and 'Gorillas in the Mist' at almost every turn.  There is even a
copycat camera shot of a scene right out of 'The Shawshank Redemption'.
Throw into the mix a confined setting where too much time is spent on one
issue and you have the atmosphere of spending an afternoon with a really
annoying relative you can't get away from.  It's a shame because the
performances in this film are very good and don't dignify the pace and
texture that this film has to offer.
Anthony Hopkins is Dr. Ethan Powell, an renowned anthropologist who goes
missing in 1994 in the jungles of Africa while on an excursion to observe
the behavioural traits of gorillas.  He is arrested for murder by the
authorities and spends a significant amount of time in custody before a U.S.
state department official brings him home and he is confined to the
psychiatric section of a maximum security prison in Florida.  A former
colleague of Powell's (Donald Sutherland) assigns a bright young
psychologist named Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.) to help Powell out of his
shell.  Powell's time in the wilderness has given him psychotic episodes
around humans where he is prone to attack them at anytime.  In fact, Powell
feels more secure and has a better peace of mind when he's in the company of
the wilderness than with humans at all, including his daughter (Maura
Tierney).  Caulder tries to establish a trusting doctor/patient relationship
with Powell but fails when Powell resists his attempts at rehabilitation
after we learn that it's not his mind that's been affected but rather his
environment.
The conditions at the so called care facility are atrocious.  The
psychiatric wing of the prison is overcrowded.  Medication levels are too
high for the men.  They aren't given the proper recreation time and the
guards are especially brutal and harsh with them.  Among the prison
employees are a pathetic doctor who's just passing time (George Dzundza) and
a tough prison guard (John Ashton) whose character is nothing more than a
stereotype.
There are two relatively interesting scenes of excitement, one near the
beginning and one near the end that give 'Instinct' moments of exclusive and
badly needed tension but the rest of the time the film is bogged down with a
lot of sappy dialogue and watered down characterizations.  Director Jon
Turteltaub who has made 'Cool Runnings', 'While You Were Sleeping' and
'Phenomenon' is not a suitable choice for this material which needs a steady
and heavy hand and not one experienced at lightweight drama, free floating
comedy or romantic overtures.
On the plus side, the performances are very stirring by the two leads.  I
was overwhelmed to see a young actor like Cuba Gooding Jr. hold his own with
a seasoned veteran like Anthony Hopkins.  The two of them are solid and are
casted well in their roles.  Too bad the screenplay by Gerald Di Pego based
on the novel entitled 'Ishmael' by Daniel Quinn is such an experience in
boredom.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
In comic books, when you go live with the animals for a couple of years you
come back a super-hero; in Instinct, that's half the case: 'Ape-man' Dr.
Ethan Powell (silverback Anthony Hopkins) does come back from the Rwandan
jungle with 'super' powers---an animal ferocity--but, as he's in the land of
men now, society locks him up in a maximum-security prison. Caging the beast
is what civilization's all about, after all. Of course, however, behind bars
is exactly where we like to see Anthony Hopkins, too, simply on the
off-chance that we might get a repeat performance of his Hannibal Lecter
role. And we're not wholly disappointed: to a certain extent, there is some
repetition going on--some of the quid pro quo we know and need--but it's not
so much Silence of the Lambs-derived as it is simply a staple of the
psychiatrist (interviewer, etc) / patient dynamic, as it's been hammered out
in movies like Dead Man Walking, True Crime, or, getting out of maximum
security for a moment, Good Will Hunting and Sixth Sense.
Perhaps most vital to that dynamic, too, is the 'surprise' reversal--that
the doctor's really the patient here, that the patient knows more than the
doctor, has whatever that doctor's been desperately needing. In Instinct,
that doctor is Theo Calder ('Calder' as in caldera, volcanic, intense; Cuba
Gooding, Jr.), a young, ambitious psychiatrist who sets himself the task of
playing Doolittle to the Ape-man--getting Powell to break his Kong-like
silence and talk, talk, talk. It can't be easy, though. Not only does Calder
have to feel his way through Powell's various mental defenses, he also has
to keep one hand free to fend off the prison bureaucracy, which doesn't
really care who gets healed, so long as precious order is maintained. If
this were a crime-movie, the warden and co. would be the police department,
doing everything in their power to keep the honest detective from solving
his case.
As far as set-up goes, all this is fine so far, but the thing with Instinct
is that it never really gets past the set-up stage, never really establishes
some problem that can be somehow resolved at the end of two hours. Which of
course makes it all feel pretty muddled. And yes, Calder's mission to get
Powell to talk is likely meant to be that problem, but A) Powell starts
talking so soon; and B) as far as problems go, this one feels suspiciously
not so much integral to the narrative as integral to the 'movie,' which is
to say Calder's mission becomes simply a contrivance to get Powell's story
on-screen. It is, however--and in spite of the sappy music--a touching story
(Connery's Medicine Man morphing into a latterday Tarzan), but too, if
you've ever seen Bambi you know how these idyllic flashbacks have to end. In
addition, Instinct does have some nice Kurtz-stuff going on, with Powell
leading Calder deeper and deeper into the heart of darkness, but it kind of
gets muted by the Free Willy stuff that eventually comes into play
(releasing the 'animal' back into the wild, etc). And the high points, as
you expect and pay for, are of course everytime Powell goes Ape. Yes,
Hannibal Lecter would likely eat Powell's liver with fava beans, but still,
and in spite of his initial sideshow attraction, Powell is another good
Hopkins performance, if only because he never goes Greystoke--never roars
and sniffs the ladies--and thus Instinct, while occasionally muddled, is
still watchable. And if the Bambi scene doesn't get to you, check your
humanity, you may be running a little low.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Eugene Novikov
"Not far from here there's a fence. On the other side of the fence is
freedom. That gorilla will never try to get to it."
Starring Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney. Rated R.
Instinct is the kind of movie that inexperienced moviegoers will
undoubtedly label as "powerful" or "touching". I have a name for it
myself: "gross". This is the sort of film where somebody stands up to a
bully, the bully looks at the "rebel" threateningly, about to hurt him,
and then everyone else whom the bully has heretofore controlled stands
up too. How that scene is still present in so many movies today appalls
me: aren't present day moviegoers beyond being "inspired" by something
like that? This is one example (there are actually some more in
Instinct alone) of filmmakers insulting the audience's intelligence.
Instinct's plot is brimming with potential: World-renowned
anthropologist Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins) disappeared for two years
whilst doing research in the jungles of Africa. He was found and is
coming back to the United States a convicted killer; he murdered to
African policemen who were allegedly trying to capture him. After
committing a few more brutal acts of violence in the airport, the
authorities stick him in a prison's "psychotics ward". Assigned to do
an evaluation on Powell is a bright (or so we are told) young
psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.).
Caulder starts out doing the evaluation merely for the purpose of
furthering his career. Of course (and no mainstream filmmaker would
ever have it any other way) he starts really caring for Powell and he
becomes fixed on helping Powell prove that he is not a psychotic and
that he should not be in prison. And then there's the inevitable
"heartless meanie" character, in the form of Donald Sutherland who
plays Caulder's mentor. He cares for Caulder but does everything he can
to discourage him from helping Powell.
Let's get one thing straight: Dr. Theo Caulder is the most blatantly
incompetent psychiatrist I have ever seen, on screen or off. Any good
shrink will listen to what his patient has to say no matter the subject
because any good shrink will learn a great deal about his patient that
way. Not good old Theo. No, he asks purposefully pointed questions and
when Powell dares to venture to another subject Caulder says "We need
to talk about this right now." This is a flaw only in the sense that it
detracts from Instinct's already dubious credibility; unfortunately
it's also the least of its problems.
Director Jon Turteltaub, who made the delightful John Travolta vehicle
Phenomenon as well as the surprisingly above-par Cool Runnings decided
to make this movie so shamelessly sentimental that, contrary to what
this movie's promotion would have you believe, it has much more in
common with Patch Adams than with The Silence of the Lambs. It's not
the kind of sentimentality that can almost bring tears to your eyes
(What Dreams May Come aptly demonstrated that) but the kind that brings
vomit up your esophagus (excuse the graphic depiction). It aims to
"inspire" rather than to touch hearts. As Yoda would say, inspire it
does not.
It is the ultimate sign of futility when a screenwriter (the very
experienced Gerald Di Pego) has to resort to literally telling the
audience a movie's story. Indeed, somewhere in the beginning of
Instinct, one of the characters actually reads aloud the film's plot to
another character. This, like the instance I mentioned in the first
paragraph of this review, is a horrid insult to our intelligence. I am
forced to wonder whether Turteltaub and Di Pego did not think that we
could figure out what Instinct is about simply from regular
conversation.
I think that Anthony Hopkins is one of the greatest screen actors, and
he chews the scenery in this movie, brilliant as ever. Oscar winner
Cuba Gooding Jr. on the other hand is dreadful. His performance is at
least part of what makes his character seem so incapable of being a
shrink. I liked the guy in Jerry Maguire as well as in As Good as it
Gets but here he fails to project any shred of credibility or real
feeling.
I love animals, and Instinct's prominent Save The Gorillas/Live in
Harmony With Nature theme is certainly something I could sympathize
with. However this movie's execution is completely unacceptable. Tone
down the violence and this will be a chick flick.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
Mac VerStandig
Jon Turteltaub's Instinct is the ultimate deja vu for anyone who 
has been awake over the past several years. Completely and utterly 
unoriginal, the movie is a collection of other Hollywood hits, Jane 
Goodall's well known ventures into the wild, an exceptionally strong 
musical score, some of the worst cinematography of the year, and a 
performance so award worthy, that it already received one 8 years ago! 
These elements result not so much in a picture, but rather a collage. 
Messily assembled, with glue sticking out on the edges, and some great 
old photos that got a little too cut up, the "artwork" really isn't 
much to behold.
Dr. Ethan Powell (Sir Anthony Hopkins) is an extremely respected 
psychiatrist. He works for a prestigious medical center and boasts of a 
family life with no apparent problems. Much of his research is done in 
Africa, having taken over 20 trips in a decade alone. His last trip to 
the continent found him missing in action (MIA), when he failed to 
return from field research one day. What followed was his spending 
nearly two years in the jungle, living among the gorillas. In short, the 
film takes what Jane Goodall accomplished when she observed these 
animals, and pushes it one step further, having the protagonist live 
among them, not as a human living a human's life, but as a human 
living the lifestyle of a gorilla. By the time Powell is brought back to 
the USA, two African police are dead with three more hospitalized, and 
he has spent a year in an African prison, all as a result of his newly 
found primitive inner self. What emerges when the plane lands in America 
is a cross between Hannibal Lector (Played by Hopkins in The Silence of 
the Lambs) and John Patrick Mason (Played by Sean Connery in The Rock), 
a killer so well educated that he can use every day objects to wreak 
havoc, but possessing an unparalleled degree of wisdom at the same time. 
Following in the early footsteps of Powell is Dr. Theo Caulder (Cuba 
Gooding Jr.). A young, energetic, and driven psychiatrist, whose 
potential is endless. His mentor is Dr. Ben Hillard (Donald Sutherland) 
who is extremely encouraging and helpful to the young doctor. So when 
the opportunity to treat Powell comes up, Caulder immediately sees not 
only the chance to further his career, but also to write a best selling 
book as well. With the help of Hillard, the assignment is soon his.
Many surprises await Dr. Caulder as he begins his treatment of the 
killer. Not only does Powell not talk, but his vicious, primal behavior 
has led to an estranged family as well. Caulder sees a source of 
information in Powell's daughter Lyn (Maura Tierney), who in turn 
wants to be reconnected with her father, a man she still deeply loves.
Many similarities exist between Instinct and other Hollywood films. Some 
are major, and some minor. But none approaches the level of near 
plagiarism found in regards to The Silence of the Lambs. Not only does 
Hopkins' presence and similar performance draw a parallel, but the 
other lead roles do as well; One of the most notable similarities being 
the role of Clarice Starling (Jodie Fostor) in the 1991 film, versus 
that of Dr. Caulder in this production. Both are energetic young people 
handling the "case" of their careers. Neither of them has an objective 
consistent with that of the genius they are studying. The question of 
how much of this work was really suggested by Daniel Quinn's novel 
Ishmael, and how much Screenwriter Gerald DiPego may have borrowed from 
his video rack, must be asked.
Both Hopkins and Gooding have Academy Awards to their name. Neither 
of them fails to meet the expectations that they are held to in this 
film. Gooding's performance is his finest since Jerry Maguire. This is 
best demonstrated in a scene where he enters a gymnasium full of 
mentally ill inmates and attempts to defy the prison staff. His cool, 
calm, and positive emotions are dazzlingly displayed in his fine 
performance, and make this scene, as well as many others, flow smoothly. 
Sir Anthony Hopkins is absolutely marvelous in his role. Despite the 
obvious resemblance to his earlier work, the character acting in his 
part is still breathtaking. His finest moment, and perhaps the most 
memorable of the film, comes when he is describing his adventures among 
apes, "They accepted a man - they took me in as family - that's the 
miracle." he explains. As these nearly melodramatic words come out of 
his mouth, he transforms them into tense, horrifying comments that send 
chills down your spine.
Danny Elfman delivers a score to accompany this film that is absolutely 
majestic. Often the music serves to compliment the dramatic and 
thrilling elements of the film, provided by the two lead actors. The 
score brings out a whole array of emotions, and often makes the scene 
complete. However, it also accompanies the weak cinematography. For a 
film largely based in Africa, certain visual expectations are naturally 
established. Unfortunately they are never met. The color is dull and 
boring, the landscape limited. An ineffective series of shots from the 
African jungle begin the film, one of the unfortunate examples of the 
lacking cinematography. It is not by any means a stretch to say that an 
average tourist could better capture these images, than Director of 
Photography Philippe Rousselot and Art Director Chris Cornwell do here.
This movie is not original by any means, and is often soar to the eye. 
Certainly, the acting is phenomenal and the score is awesome. But unless 
you have a desire to see Hopkins' interpretation of a murdering 
genius, then this isn't worth the money, not even on video. And if you 
do want to see it, The Silence of the Lambs is already at a store near 
you.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Jon Turtletaub
Cast: Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, George Dzundza
Screenplay: Gerald Di Pego (based on the novel by Daniel Quinn)
Producers: Barbara Boyle, Michael Taylor
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Buena Vista Pictures
Rated R: Violence
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
You know, I never really wondered what the Tarzan films would have been
like had Tarzan been an old man.  While watching Instinct, I couldn't
help but acknowledge the way the film carelessly rehashes the
well-explored themes of those earlier movies.  Even beside the Tarzan
comparison, Instinct just isn't a very good film.  It's painfully
idealistic, manipulative, and silly.  I didn't hate it --  it's simply
impossible for me to hate any film starring Anthony Hopkins;
furthermore, most of the acting is quite good.  But I can recognize
Instinct for what it is beyond my subjective admiration for the actors
involved.  I can also recognize reasons for wanting to make Instinct,
and it's pretty clear that this could have been a good film with a
massive script overhaul and a director less interested in imitating
movies like Patch Adams.  
Things start off in the predictable way, as director Jon Turtletaub
introduces us to our hero, Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding, Jr.), an
ambitious, young psychiatrist under the supervision of an experienced,
old psychiatrist (Donald Sutherland).  Caulder soon finds himself
involved in the case of his life, the one he thinks will make him
famous.  The subject is Ethan Powell (Hopkins), an anthropologist who
has been living among gorillas in Africa for the past two years.  Powell
has been charged with the brutal murders of several men in Africa, and
it's now Caulder's job to find out of he's mentally competent enough to
stand trial.  Through a series of short sessions, Caulder tries to put
together the complex psyche of Powell.  
Even though it really is an old man version of Tarzan, much of this
central idea is rather interesting.  As I said, Hopkins is captivating
for every second he's on screen; he has a way of convincing us that he's
not acting, that he's actually a man who has just spent two years of his
life living with a family of wild gorillas.  The character himself isn't
very interesting -- he's just an anthropologist who really likes
gorillas -- but Hopkins makes him interesting with subtleties both in
speech and action.  Gooding Jr. does strong work opposite Hopkins,
playing Caulder as an intelligent and flawed individual.  The
screenplay, written by Gerald Di Pego and "suggested by" a novel by
Daniel Quinn, gives us no background information on Caulder, but that
seems to be the point (he has no time for friends because he's obsessed
with his work).  Nonetheless, these two actors are essentially the
entire list of things that are good about Instinct.
Unfortunately, filmmaking this inept can mangle the effect of even the
best acting.  Turtletaub and Di Pego are both guilty of Instinct's
artistic failure, for they work together to make the dumbest, most
cliche-ridden environment in which their characters are to live, and
they do so by means of brainless subplots.  First, we have the prison
warden subplot.  The prison warden is evil and wants to stop Caulder's
progress at any cost; if this means taking Caulder off the Powell case,
then that's fine.  There's also the prison guard subplot.  The prison
guard is played by John Ashton; the prison guard seems to enjoy
mercilessly beating upon the psychotics under his supervision, and he's
instrumental in helping the story along to its obvious conclusion.  Then
there's the daughter subplot, in which Maura Tierney (playing the
daughter) must look very upset a lot of the time; after all, she is the
daughter of a deranged man.
If some of this stuff sounds familiar, that's because they're all
devices that have been used and reused in countless other films.  The
evil doctor in Patch Adams is not unlike the evil warden here.  The
offensive caricatures of mental patients lack the depth that the similar
portrayals in One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest had.  Ashton's evil prison
guard pales in comparison to Clancy Brown's in The Shawshank
Redemption.  Hopkins' performance will undoubtedly remind audiences of
his turn in The Silence of the Lambs.  And then there's the whole Tarzan
thing, which is more than a little bit obvious through the entire
film.    
Perhaps what irritates me most about Instinct is the half-hearted
attempt at philosophical depth.  The message Powell brings back from the
wild is not a subtle one:  he thinks that humans are "takers," that they
expand and kill and that we should all just live like gorillas.  I can
sympathize with that, but only when it's in a compelling film.  This is
the kind of stupid movie -- just like Patch Adams -- in which a big
group of characters (psychotic inmates, in this case) rise against the
evil forces oppressing them by tearing up playing cards.  What does any
of this have to do with a man who has just spent two years of his life
with gorillas?  If all the subplots of Instinct had been left on the
cutting room floor, we would have had a thirty-minute movie far superior
to the two-hour one that I watched today.  If the central idea had been
developed beyond the Old Man Tarzan premise, then we would really have
had something interesting -- a movie that doesn't rely on the strength
of its actors.

Author
James Brundage
Based on the novel "Ishmael" by Daniel Quinn
Starring Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, George Dzundza, and John Ashton
     The character drama, I think I can safely say, is dead as far as studio
films are concerned.  Yes, in 1997, we had Gattaca, the interesting tale of
a futuristic society in which everyone is genetically engineered, but I
haven't seen anything since then.  If I racked my mind, I might be able to
come up with a few examples of studio films with good characters, but not
studio films that are good character dramas.  They're long gone.
     Whenever a genre dies in studio films, there is a period of time where
we experience throwbacks from that genre films that are attempting to
salvage a dying movement in the celluloid medium.  With few exceptions,
these fail.  A prime example: The Mummy, which was an attempt to bring back
the adventure style film of the Indiana Jones trilogy.  Instinct is yet
another throwback.
     Instinct -- a movie that comes across as The Shawshank Redemption meets
One Flew Over the Cookoo's Nest meets Gorillas in the Mist meets Silence of
the Lambs -- spends its time trying to be something it can't possibly be:
good.  Sure, it may be entertaining and, considering the attention span of
the average person, it may bring tears to your eyes, but as far as quality
goes, Instinct falters.
     Instinct follows the intersection of a psychotic killer (Dr. Ethan
Powell, played by Anthony Hopkins) playing a game of cat and mouse with a
student of psychology (Theo Caulder, played by Cuba Gooding, Jr.).  Have we
not seen this before?  Let's change that around a little bit by adding that
Powell doesn't eat people he beats them to death with a club and hangs out
with gorillas.  Again, we have seen this before.  To make it a little less
original, we'll throw in a bit about a brutal prison and a brutal insane
asylum.  Been there, done that.
     Instinct, a film that, as near as I can tell, is meant to pose a
question about the values of a materialistic society, poses another question
for us: have films reached the same level as matter: all engineered parts
built on basic units that we understand?
 There is nothing new to Instinct and, although I have had four years of
this to tell me otherwise, I still hope deep down that originality should be
part of my rubric for grading a film.  So I am an idealist.  It duplicates
each one of the aforementioned movies practically shot by shot (i.e. Cuba
Gooding, Jr. with his arms outstretched, enjoying the rain and bringing up
memories of Tim Robbins' similar performance in The Shawshank Redemption).
     Before you start sinking in your seat, please remember that, although
the character drama is dead, Instinct did not kill it.  Instinct is a
character drama.  The characters are stock, the situations are hackneyed,
and the general impression you get is that the writer was half asleep when
he wrote it.  Still, Instinct remains moderately enjoyable.
     It is funny that I call it this because, this afternoon, I was having a
talk with a friend about the people who truly control your tear ducts at a
film: the cinematographers and the music composers.  With Danny Elfman, an
uneducated but highly skilled man behind the keyboard and Philippe
Rousselot, cinematographer of A River Runs Through it and Interview with the
Vampire behind the camera, you can understand how they play the audience
like a fiddle.
     Sure, the actors doing a top-notch job with bottom-rung roles helps a
lot, but were it not for the clean cut score and the pretty images, I may
very well have angrily stormed out of the theatre or tried to incite a riot
to rush the screen.  But I didn't.  It wasn't quite that bad.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Touchstone Pictures/Spyglass Entertainment
 Director:  Jon Turteltaub
 Writer:  Gerald DiPego
 Cast: Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald
Sutherland, Maura Tierney, George Dzundza, John Ashton,
John Aylward
   The massacre at Columbine High School in Littleton,
Colorado, received massive publicity partly because of the
extent of the tragedy, but as much because the perpetrators
were privileged kids living in an upper- middle class suburban
area of the country.  Psychologists appear to agree that the
killers--who wore trench coats and referred to themselves as
mafia--were outsiders, disdained and ignored not only by the
"in" cliques of athletes but by women and scholarly types as
well.  They did not fit in and so they took brutal revenge.  
   "Instinct" deals as well with a violent man--one who
becomes an outsider, but by his own volition. Repudiating the
safety, prestige and comfort of his academic profession, he
puts himself outside of so-called civilized society, living alone
among the gorillas of Rwanda for two years.  For motivations
which should not be revealed in a review lest such disclosure
spoil a key plot point, the man summons fearsome strength in
attacking park rangers with a wooden club, killing two and
injuring others.  Placed in a solitary cell in a bleak African
prison for a year, he grows his white hair and beard to great
lengths and refuses to speak to anyone.  But because he is a
celebrated anthropologist, the U.S. State Department
manages to secure his release, fly him back to Florida, and
incarcerate him in a maximum security prison that resembles
the institution of last year's documentary "The Farm" more
than it does the correctional facility displayed in the movie
"Life."
   "Instinct," which balances educated (if sophomoric)
discussion with occasional bouts of violence, juggles more
ideas about the human condition than Freud and Kierkegaard
could have formulated in a year.  While nothing novel is
trumpeted--certainly nothing that would gain the attention of
major peer-review magazines--director Jon Turteltaub
("Phenomenon," "3 Ninjas") keeps both the physical action
and the verbal exchanges flowing, gradually revealing the
demons that arouse the scholar to murderous fury.  The
picture shows off unusually good chemistry between Anthony
Hopkins as the besieged prisoner Ethan Powell and Cuba
Gooding, Jr. as Theo Caulder--the therapist who seeks to
uncover the mystery of the professor's mind but winds up
finding out more about himself than he learns about his
reluctant patient.
   The story opens in Rwanda (actually filmed among the lush
vegetation of Jamaica) as Professor Ethan Powell (Anthony
Hopkins) is transferred by the African authorities to the U.S.
State Department in preparation for his incarceration in a
prison for the criminally insane in Florida. The ironically-
named Harmony Bay facility, run by a pragmatic warden
(John Aylward) and staffed by psychiatrist John Murray
(George Dzundza) and brutal guards like Dacks (John
Ashton), is overcrowded.  To help control the inmates, the
prison resorts to the principle of divide and rule, manipulating
the convicts to take out their anger on one another rather
than on the staff.  Dr. Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding, Jr.) is
assigned to assist in the psychotherapy, but his real interest
is in Dr. Powell.  What makes a man in a staid, secure
profession turn violently criminal?  
   Those sections of "Instinct" that deal with the  turbulent talk
sessions between the anthropologist and the psychiatrist are
the most involving, notwithstanding the Psych. 101 level of
dialogue.  As the two professional men talk--or, rather, stalk
each other like creatures on a Rwandan jungle--they make us
privy to such issues as the nature of freedom, the lust for
control and domination, and the concept of illusion.  When
Powell accuses his helper of being a "taker," a person
consumed, even tied-up-in-knots by ambition, we think of the
character of Tracy Flick in Alexander Payne's great satire,
"Election."
   As Dr. Caulder encourages the patient to "show me the
violence"  he learns quite a bit about himself.  He finds out
that his primary motive is not the search for knowledge but
his own desire to advance his career--to publish an article
about his unhappy patient, perhaps even to get out a
best-seller that re-creates the buttoned-up psychiatrist as a
genuine hero.  
   As "Instinct" is a studio-made film, an entertaining, well-
acted one indeed, we are not surprised by the dollops of
sentimentality that scripter Gerald DiPego uses to pepper the
action.  Powell's daughter Lyn (Maura Tierney) yearns to
have her estranged father "back," but Powell does not want
even to talk about her.  When Caulder lends the intelligent
and witty, but heartbroken, woman an ear, director Turteltaub
hints at a budding romance between the two.  The story
strains credibility at various points: where does a sixty-year
old academic get the strength to virtually pulverize a three-
hundred pound, much younger prisoner, and to smash his
way through a batallion of police officers determined to
restrain him?  By what vigor can he overpower several young
and muscular African park rangers who, presumably, work
out quite a bit more than the hirsute primatologist?   How
does Powell manage to get the lion's share of attention from
the guards and to have his session run from a room inside
the prison, while the other unfortunates, who need services
as well in this overcrowded facility, must settle for quick
meetings in an entirely public part of the recreation area?
   Donald Sutherland does a credible job as Ben HIllard, who
is Theo Caulder's mentor, who advises the ambitious
young man to think primarily of his career and not of his wish
to help the enraged and frequently silent patient he is
studying.  John Ashton has the appropriate demeanor as the
sadistic guard.  But the other supporting players who are
prisoners--Paul Bates as Bluto, Ian Ingram as Lester
Rodman, and Thomas Q. Morris as Pete--are directed as
cartoonish characters.
   Many in the audience will be reminded of "The Silence of
the Lambs," in which Anthony Hopkins dazzled as the
psychotic criminal Hannibal the Cannibal Lecter, with Jodie
Foster in the Cuba Gooding, Jr. role as the person who tries
to get through to him.  But "Instinct" is closer in
temperament to Peter Shaffer's play "Equus," the story of an
English psychiatrist, Martin Dysart, working with an obsessed
lover of horses, Alan Strang, who commits a barbarous act. 
While Dysart is horrified by his patient's psychosis, he
secretly admires the young man's vitality and ends up
questioning his own staid, middle-class life.  "Instinct" is
inspired by the screenwriter's book, "Ishmael," more of a
meditation between a man and a gorilla than an action
adventure.  Turteltaub has turned the book into a not-always-
convincing balance of escapade and reflection, eminently
watchable with its National Geographic-like shots of Hopkins
living as a human being among the gorillas that fully accept
him.  

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Jon Turteltaub.
Cast: Cuba Gooding Jr., Anthony Hopkins, Maura Tierney, Donald 
Sutherland, George Dzundza, John Aylward, John Ashton.
1999 - 126 minutes
Rated R (for violence and profanity).
Reviewed June 6, 1999.
So the theatrical trailer set the film up to be an exciting thriller, 
when in actuality it is a deliberately-paced prison drama. I can live 
with this deceivement, of course, because motion picture trailers 
falsely advertise all the time (remember how 1998's marvelous "Rushmore" 
was billed as a crazy, lowbrow, madcap comedy?). What is an outrage, 
however, is how director Jon Turteltaub's "Instinct" is a direct rip-off 
of hundreds of other movies, and not even a passable one at that, as it 
piles on such thick, nauseating layers of weepy, unbelievable melodrama 
when, judging from the overall premise, we should be on the edge of our 
seats. Do not put the blame on the actors for this film's failings, 
although they all should have known better. No, the culprits of 
"Instinct" are Turteltaub, whose direction is flat and emotionless (even 
though, strangely enough, the characters all wear their caricaturized 
emotions on their sleeves), and screenwriter Gerald DiPego, adapting 
from the 1992 novel, "Ishmael," by Daniel Quinn, who apparently has no 
idea how to construct interesting or stimulating dialogue. If anything, 
DiPego does have the non-virtue of corniness down pat.
"Instinct" begins as dedicated primatologist Ethan Powell (Anthony 
Hopkins) is being transported to the run-down Harmony Bay Correctional 
Facility, following a 2-year disappearance within the jungles of Rwanda, 
where he lived with the apes, and the animalistic murders of two park 
rangers. Enter novice psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.), who 
is assigned to take on the case by his mentor, Dr. Ben Hillard (Donald 
Sutherland), and travel down to Harmony Bay to speak with Powell, who 
has since stopped talking and obtained a nasty temper, to put it mildly. 
After arriving, Caulder is almost instantly repulsed by the way the 
inmates are treated by the prison warden (John Aylward) and guards, 
being shocked or severely beaten simply for looking at their superiors 
crossway. After their first few meetings, Powell surprisingly begins to 
talk again, discussing his tranquil experiences among the apes of the 
Rwanda jungles, as well as his apprehension to reunite with his loving 
daughter (Maura Tierney), whom he feels he has drifted too far from for 
their relationship to be salvaged. There's really not much more to 
discuss story-wise, since the majority of the running time is dedicated 
to endless babbling between Caulder and Powell, neither of whom have 
anything worthwhile to say to each other.
"Instinct" is a strange film, indeed. On one end is the relationship 
that forms between Powell and Caulder. Many viewers have compared this 
film to "The Silence of Lambs," but they have very few similarities, 
even though Powell is supposed to be a killer, and the performance by 
Hopkins is very different than that of Hannibal Lecter. As Caulder 
learns more and more about why Powell was lead to murder after his 
beloved apes began to be hunted, we are supposed to believe that Caulder 
has a life-changing transformation. This aspect of the film is about as 
easy to swallow as a chicken bone, and when Caulder tells Powell in the 
groan-inducing climax that he has been "saved," I didn't believe it for 
a second. For one, how can audiences understand how Caulder has been 
saved when throughout the film, the only thing we learn about him is 
that he is a young psychiatrist. Do we learn about his past? His family? 
No. Apparently he has no actual life outside of his profession, and it 
is this problem that thoroughly peeves me. Why exactly is it that in the 
majority of films about lawyers or psychiatrists, we are never allowed 
to learn anything about them? Are screenwriters so lazy, or clueless, in 
today's times to write at least a few scenes in which we actually get to 
know the characters? I guess so. And the sight of Caulder late in the 
film, with his arms outstretched in the middle of a rainstorm, is 
blatant plagarism of 1994's somewhat similar prison drama, "The 
Shawshank Redemption."
Unexpectedly, about half of the running time is actually dedicated to 
the way the one-dimensional guards and warden abuse the inmates which, I 
guess, is a direct ode to "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest." This 
subplot is written in such a heavy-handed, manipulative manner that we 
are even pushed to suffer through an "uplifting" riot scene, headed by 
Caulder, who wants to overthrow the unjust way in which the inmates are 
chosen to go outside each day (it is done by giving out playing cards, 
and the winner is the holder of the ace of diamonds). As everyone begins 
to chant the same triumphant thing in unison, one at a time they tear up 
their cards and through them to the floor. This is peeve #2 in the 
annals of syrupy moviemaking.
Finally, the third section of the film, which is given the least amount 
of time but is the only bearable one, deals with Powell's neglected 
daughter. A possible romance is brought up briefly between Caulder and 
she, but it is quickly dropped, leaving me to wonder why the whole scene 
wasn't simply cut out. This subplot does mildly work, nonetheless, 
mainly because of Maura Tierney's touching performance and it holds the 
best scene in the film, the inevitable reunion between father and 
daughter.
Aside from the disasterous writing and directing, "Instinct" has its 
fair share of other problems, as well, beginning with the painfully 
overlong 2-hour-plus running time, about fifteen minutes of which is 
unnecessarily dedicated to Powell sitting around in the jungle with the 
apes. Speaking of the scenes set in the Rwandan jungles, it is so poorly 
shot, and the cinematography, by Philippe Rousselot, so insipid, that it 
more or less could have been filmed in the woods right next to my house. 
The usually reliable composer Danny Elfman (long-time collaborator with 
Tim Burton) also has struck out this time with a generic, forgettable 
music score.
With a film headed by talented performers Anthony Hopkins and Cuba 
Gooding Jr., you are ultimately led to believe that there will be at 
least some source of worthwhile material. Not this time. "Instinct" is a 
consistently dull, meandering motion picture that is never anything more 
than difficult to sit through and cannot be salvaged by the relatively 
unextraordinary performances of Gooding Jr. and Hopkins. About 25% of 
the audience I was with got up and left even before the end credits 
appeared. They had the right idea.
    - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
      Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
INSTINCT
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding Jr., Donald Sutherland, Maura
Tierney, John Ashton, George Dzundza.
Screenplay:  Gerald DiPego, based on the novel _Ishmael_ by Daniel Quinn.
Producers:  Michael Taylor and Barbara Boyle.
Director:  Jon Turtletaub.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, adult themes)
Running Time:  124 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There was a sense of deja-vu developing long before I actually saw
INSTINCT, inspired by the presentation of the basic premise in the
trailers.  Here was Anthony Hopkins, playing a brilliant scientist turned
hair-trigger madman, turning the tables on a confident young interviewer
trying to get inside his head...I couldn't help but think I'd seen this
somewhere before.  Then I saw the film, and it all became clear.  This
wasn't just a case of Hopkins flexing his Hannibal Lecter muscles again
before taking on the film version of Thomas Harris' recently-published
sequel to THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.  He was simply keeping pace with a
story that slaps together characters, situations and exact shots from
dozens of other films.
     INSTINCT is a sloppy, derivative drama focusing on the interaction
between primatologist Dr. Ethan Powell (Hopkins) and psychiatric resident
Dr. Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.).  Powell, a once-noted expert on
gorillas, is now a mute inmate in a prison psychiatric ward after
murdering two men in the jungle of Rwanda; Caulder, an ambitious
up-and-comer, sees interviewing Powell for a compentency evaluation as his
ticket to professional stardom.  Powell eventually does open up to
Caulder, but only because he has a message to relate.  In flashback we see
Powell becoming ever more connected to the family of gorillas he is
studying until he is accepted as one of them.  His experience leads him to
a realization about the nature of human behavior in the world, a lesson he
intends to impart on his impromptu pupil Caulder.
     You could spend a productive day doing little more than ticking off
the films from which INSTINCT cribs:  ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST,
GORILLAS IN THE MIST, TARZAN, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION and even DEAD POETS
SOCIETY in addition to THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.  Gerald DiPego's script
plods along, dropping its familiar cinematic tropes like bread crumbs
leading the audience to its responses.  There's the psychiatrist who's
really more confused than his patient, the prison guard (John Ashton)
whose casual sadism is treated as a bona fide job requirement, and the
collection of mental patients who become lovable comic relief.  There's
even a scene of confounding idiocy in which we, the knee-jerking audience,
are supposed to cheer for Caulder irresponsibly whipping a room full of
jailed psychotics into a rebellious frenzy.  INSTINCT is so gruellingly
predictable that you may be surprised momentarily when Powell's daughter
(Maura Tierney) doesn't become a love interest for Caulder, until you
realize that this is just a slightly different, more insulting cliche:  a
black man and a white woman are allowed to be "just friends."
     Somehow, in the midst of so much uninspired tripe, Anthony Hopkins
still manages to come through with a performance that's invigorating to
watch.  Sure, it's a spin on Hannibal Lecter, but it's more fiercely
intelligent than anything the rest of the film can deliver.  You can't
help but lean forward when you hear that seductive baritone; you can't
help but shudder when Caulder's neck hinges on the correct answer to a
very tricky question.  Hopkins makes INSTINCT better.  He also makes it
worse, because everything else looks even more workmanlike, notably
Cuba Gooding Jr.'s performance.  Gooding is all facial twitches and
exposition explaining the tremendous change in his life wrought by Powell.
A little economy and subtlety -- skills Hopkins demonstrates even when
playing a wild man -- could have served Gooding well.
     Sadly, subtlety is one thing INSTINCT has in very short supply.  Even
viewers prepared to sympathize with the film's fuzzy embrace of the state
of nature will find this more a philosophical tract (albeit one with
remarkably realistic animatronic apes by Stan Winston) than a compelling
drama.  We all know man bad/animals good, which makes the decision to turn
the humans into cartoonish villains even more perplexing.  If there were a
moment of real insight into a character, the rest of INSTINCT's brainless
cinematic thievery might have been more tolerable.  Instead, it lets
breathing plot devices gab at one another for two hours between
unnervingly familiar situations.  Thank heavens for the entertainment
value of Anthony Hopkins' gloss on film's best-known cannibal.  It's only
fitting in a film that does plenty of cannibalizing of its own.

Author
Michael Redman
The most dangerous threat to modern civilization isn't nuclear war. Nor is it
corrupt politicians, greedy big business or economic collapse. The biggest
danger, the thing that could bring our society as we know it to a screeching
halt, is if people were to wake up.
A sleeping population is what greases the wheels of modern commerce. If the
guys flipping burgers were to suddenly realize how they're spending most of
their lives, you'd never get a Big Mac again. If everyone who hated their jobs
decided to do something more meaningful to them, we'd find empty offices and stores.
Noted anthropologist and primatologist Ethan Powell (Anthony Hopkins) gets in
touch with what is really real -- and he goes to live with the apes.
As the film opens, Powell is being transferred from a horrid prison in Rwanda
to American authorities. Charged with attacking a group of men and killing two
of them, he is then incarcerated in an equally barbaric prison for the
criminally insane in the US. He refuses to speak, even to defend himself.
Ambitious young psychiatrist Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding, Jr.) sees Powell as
his ticket to ride the career fast track and volunteers to perform his
evaluation. Attempting to get inside the former researcher's head, he tracks
down Powell's estranged daughter for clues. Along the way, he has to do battle
with cruel prison guards, his icy mentor and the frustrated ineffectual prison psychiatrist.
When Caulder finally gets the wild man to communicate, he discovers there's
more going on than psychosis and often becomes Powell's student. He slowly
learns to see beyond the illusions he's been indoctrinated with.
Loosely based on the novel Ishmael, this is a tale of just how thin the
veneer of civilization is and what we have given up. After years of observing
gorillas in the wild, Powell is accepted as one of them. Spending more and
more time with the apes, he doesn't return to his camp to sleep one night. In
a powerful scene, he leaves his binoculars and machete behind, joins the
gorilla family and doesn't go to work anymore.
Hopkins is a remarkable actor. The audience hangs on his every word and
slightest movement. He isn't just playing the part of a scientist gone native,
he becomes that character. Gooding, he of the most furrowed brow in cinema, is
completely believable as the obstinate analyst forced to examine his own life.
The jungle scenery is beautiful and the gorillas more authentic than anything
seen before.
This could have been a four-star film but there are some elements that seem
overly familiar. A few scenes and characters are lifted directly from "One
Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest". Director Jon Turteltaub ("Phenomenon") borrows
liberally from "Silence Of The Lambs", "Tarzan", "Gorillas In The Mist" and
prison reform films such as "Brubaker".
The mystery of why Powell kills is a key plot element but it isn't much of a
puzzle. 
There are a few film cliches. The guards are evil and uncaring. A couple of
insane murderers are cute and cuddly. Prison is a bad place. Animals are noble
savages and humans, marauding destroyers. Occasionally the pacing falters. It
does avoid one trap. A potential obligatory love interest turns, instead, into
a friendship.
For any other film, these flaws might have ruined the movie. Here, Hopkins is
so commanding that you'll fall right into the story, forgetting the artistic
problems. His performance and the powerful underlying message overwhelm the
structural defects.
Very few people are going to give up their successful professional careers to
run off and live with the beasts. The metaphor for what Joseph Campbell calls
"following your bliss" won't be taken to heart by many. Most of us are too
satisfied with bread and circuses to take that type of chance. But what if we did?
(Michael Redman has written this column for almost 24 years and is heading out
the door to live in the wilds of southern Indiana with the raccoons. He'll
probably still get email at Redman@indepen.com)
[This appeared in the 6/10/99 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review: http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
Y2K articles: http://www.indepen.com/

Author
Frankie Paiva
There are some actors that you just look at and will automatically see them as
the famous character they play. Fran Drescher will forever will the Nanny, Bob
Denver will always be Gilligan, and Don Knotts lives forever as Barney Fife.
All these people are television actors who appear on their show, week after
week playing the same character, so it is hard for this to translate into
celebrities who appear in movies. Anthony Hopkins on the other hand apparently
wants us to always think of him as a crazed madman behind bars. This is the
only reason I could come up with for him to take the leading role in Instinct,
a new movie that re-defines cliched and painful. It does not matter if the
prison inmates are tough praying on the few weak ones, or that the guards give
new meaning to police brutality. You could probably withstand all of the above
material on a good bucket of popcorn and a very large soda. But the movie can't
even be even fun and smart on a summer movie level, and fails miserably to make
us excited or scared in any way.
Dr. Theo Calder is a young psychologist who is very high in the areas of
self-confidence and self-assurance. He wants to begin seeing a crazed scientist
who recently was transported from a prison in Africa to one in the states.
Ethan Powell (Hopkins, playing the role of Hannibal Lecter’s non-cannibal
cousin) was a scientist who disappeared in the forests of Africa in 1994. He
lived in the forest with the gorillas he studies for two years before killing
two park rangers and injuring two more while trying to protect his gorilla
family. In the first interview Theo learns some problems that may hinder the
investigation of Ethan. One, he doesn't speak to anyone at all. Two, he hasn't
experienced human interaction in so long he responds to almost everything with
violent outbursts. Three, the doctors at the prison just don't care. How
dramatic, how thrilling, how (inserting snoring sounds here). 
Eventually he does get the man to finally utter a few words, but the
psychiatrist soon finds himself to be the one who’s being taught a lesson.
There’s some message about how no human actually has control, they just think
they do, that is what Powell teaches him. Dr. Calder soon expands his horizons
as a realizes that is may not be the people in the prison, but the prison
itself. The problems with the inmates must live with are guards that are not
fair to them and treat them with harshly and violently. Plus, oh my God!
everyone in the prison is not being treated with proper respect.
OK, let us take a poll: Who would ever really care about what happens to any of
the people in this movie? See it and if you don’t come out disgusted then I
will personally pay for your next outing to the cinema. (NOTE: The preceding
sentence was just to prove a point that this movie is bad, I will not pay for
your next movie so don’t e-mail me asking for money.) The acting in the film
is just horrible. Hopkins does nothing in the role that he is accustomed to,
and Cuba has some keen intellectual ability to pick bad roles that will make
him lose his star status. This is not entirely the actor’s faults though. The
script could easily have been written better if the proper time was taken with
it. The soapy emotion that floats up near the end of the film also doesn’t
make any sense with all of the happenings in the beginning of the picture. The
setting is uninteresting and the story has too many side plots that they do
nothing with which just seem to be there to add to the running time. You could
rip up all of the copies (with gloves on so as not to burn your fingers) of
this movie at your local video store. You could warn people who try to rent it,
or you could make a big bonfire and burn all of the copies in the neighborhood.
Whatever you can do to help make sure that no one on earth will ever have to
experience this film (I believe) would be greatly appreciated by the American
public. So if you haven’t gotten the message yet, avoid Instinct, which gets 
1/2 a *. 
The Young-Uns: The film contains some suspenseful scenes and strong language.
It is also senselessly brutal and violent in some scenes. Good Age: No One Who
Is Sober/Anyone Who Liked Chill Factor 
A Review by Frankie Paiva
The 12 Year-Old Movie Reviewer
E-Mail me at SwpStke@aol.com
Visit my website at http://www.homestead.com/teenagemoviecritic/mainpage.html

Author
Steve Rhodes
Anthony Hopkins, who appears born to play an English butler as he did in
THE REMAINS OF THE DAY, has a phenomenal acting range with one of his
most famous roles as the psychotic killer, Hannibal Lecter.
Hopkins gets to chew up the scenery again as a killer in INSTINCT, a
strange movie that blends elements of THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, ONE FLEW
OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST and GORILLAS IN THE MIST.
Playing opposite Anthony Hopkins is another Academy Award winner, Cuba
Gooding Jr.  The two of them match wits in an acting battle that's much
more interesting than the derivative material they have to work with.
As directed by Jon Turteltaub (3 NINJAS), written by Gerald Di Pego, and
"inspired by" Daniel Quinn's novel "Ishmael," the story is at once
mysterious and strangely familiar.  The story's big mystery is so
obvious that it isn't clear why the people in the movie don't solve it
immediately without any further investigation.
Anthropologist Dr. Ethan Powell (Hopkins) is returned to the United
States after being convicted for using a club to kill some Rwandan game
wardens.  At the time he had been spending the last two years living as
an animal among the gorillas.  Dr. Powell says that he was actually
living as the cave men would have done, among the apes, not as an ape.
Dr. Theo Caulder (Gooding), an up-and-coming psychiatrist, lands the
plum assignment of performing the psychiatric evaluation of Dr. Powell,
with the big open question being why he turned violent.  Dr. Powell's
violence continues into the present as he attacks anyone who threatens
him.
Most of the movie consists of the long psychiatric examinations of Dr.
Powell by Dr. Caulder.  With frequent flashbacks, Dr. Powell tells his
story of life among the gorillas.
The distracting and hackneyed side plot concerns the prison in which Dr.
Powell is housed.  Run by cliched, sadistic guards, the prison is lifted
straight out of a hundred other movies.  This part of the story is an
embarrassment next to the fine acting of the main story.  Sadly, this
brutal, overcrowded prison theme is allocated large amounts of screen
time.  And the better part of the story is allowed to drag more times
than you can count.  With lesser actors in the lead, one suspects the
movie might have been unwatchably bad.
Some movies grow on you after you've seen them.  INSTINCT has just the
opposite effect.  The more you think about the material, the more it
seems like such a retread of so many other films.  Absent the two
superlative performances, there is nothing to recommend the picture.
INSTINCT runs too long at 2:06.  It is rated R for strong violence and
some profanity and would be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com
